src/orthography/hyphenations.twolc
Alphabet

a e i o u y ä ö
b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S Š T U V W X Y Z Ž Å Ä Ö

’:%' %':’ ’ %'
%{hyph%?%}:0 %{hyph%?%}:%-
%-

%>:0 %> 
»:0 »
≥:0 ≥
%|:0  %|
%_:0 %_:0

%{%>%}:%> %{%»%}:»
;

Sets
Markers = %> %_ %| » ≥ ;
Vowels = a e i o u y ä ö ;
Consonants = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ;
UpperOrSyms = A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S Š T U V W X Y Z Ž Å Ä Ö  %0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 %- ;

Rules

"Disallow no hyphen on vowel boundaries"
%{hyph%?%}:0 /<= Vv :0*  _ :0* Vv ; where Vv in Vowels ;

"Require hyphen on some caps"
%{hyph%?%}:%- <= UpperOrSyms [? - :%- ]* _ ;
            _ :0* UpperOrSyms ;

"Don't remove markers that are not boundaries"
Markers <=> .#. ?:0* _ ?:0* .#. ;
